Illinois, session 104th, HB1888.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:5    (1) Prescribed fire is a traditional land management 6practice and public safety tool used by land managers to 7reduce hazardous fuels; reduce the risk of destructive 8wildfires; control invasive species; improve access to, and 9the appearance of, land; and control detrimental insects and 10forest diseases.11    (2) While prescribed fire is the most important land 12management practice used in maintaining and restoring healthy 13landscapes, only approximately 6% of conservation lands in 14Illinois are currently being managed with prescribed fire.15    (3) Prescribed fire deserves recognition and appreciation 16due to its ecological, economic, and cultural benefits to the 17State of Illinois. 18    Section 5. The State Commemorative Dates Act is amended by 19adding Section 197 as follows: 20    (5 ILCS 490/197 new)21    Sec. 197. Prescribed Fire Awareness Month. The month of 22March of each year is designated as Prescribed Fire Awareness   HB1888- 2 -LRB104 07709 BDA 17754 b1Month, to be observed throughout the State as a month to 2celebrate the multiple ecological, economic, and cultural 3benefits of prescribed fire to the State of Illinois.